Utah statutes.
72-8-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Construction" means the function of constructing or reconstructing a
sidewalk with or without curb and gutter and includes land acquisition and
engineering or inspection as defined by the rules and regulations of the
department.
(2)  "Curb and gutter" means the area between the roadway and sidewalk
designed for water runoff and providing a barrier for safety of pedestrian and
vehicular traffic.
(3)  "Participating municipality" means a city of the third, fourth, or fifth
class or a town.
(4)  "Pedestrian safety devices" means any device or method designed to foster
the safety of pedestrian traffic including sidewalks, curbs, gutters, and
pedestrian overpasses.
